Hawaii statutes.
[§846-52] Responsibility for system. (a)
The department of the attorney general shall be responsible for the
collection, storage, dissemination, and analysis of all hate crime data
from all agencies that have primary investigative, action, or program responsibility
for adult or juvenile offenses, including the county police departments, the
county prosecutors, the family courts, and the departments or agencies
responsible for administering any correctional facilities.

(b) The attorney general shall develop the
system and the procedures for reporting, inputting, accessing, and protecting
the information concerning the commission of hate crimes and obtaining the
agreement of agencies permitted to directly input and access information.

(c) Hate crime data collected by the attorney
general may be shared with other agencies in accordance with section 92F-19.
Public dissemination of this information shall be subject to section 92F-13. [L
2001, c 240, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next